Utah statutes.
59-3-103.   Value of tax equivalent property included as part of value of
taxable property.
In determining the value of taxable property within any tax area for purposes
of computing the limitation on indebtedness under Article XIV, Sec. 4, Utah
Constitution, the value of all tax equivalent property shall be included as a
part of the total value of taxable property.
